hr-HR: Hardver za pričvršćivanje uzice: Kopča za značku; Kolut za značku; Karabiner; D-prsten; Privjesak za ključeve; Karabiner-kopča; Brzo otpuštajuća kopča; Kopča s oprugom; Rascjepni prsten; Okretna kopča; Ostalo
lt-LT: Kaklajuostės tvirtinimo detalės: Ženklelio segtukas; Ženklelio ritė; Karabinas; D formos žiedas; Raktų žiedas; Karabino tipo užsegimas; Greitojo atsegimo sagtis; Užfiksuojamas kabliukas; Padalytas žiedas; Sukiojamas kabliukas; Kita
fi: Kaulanauhan kiinnitystarvikkeet: Tunnusklipsi; Tunnuskela; Karbiinihaka; D-rengas; Avaimenperä; Papukaijalukko; Pikalukko; Jousihaka; Avainrengas; Leikarihaka; Muu
ja: ランヤードアタッチメントハードウェア: バッジクリップ; バッジリール; カラビナ; Dカン; キーリング; ロブスタークラスプ; クイックリリースバックル; スナップフック; スプリットリング; スイベルフック; その他
es: Tipo de herraje de sujeción del cordón: Clip de emblema; Carrete de emblema; Mosquetón; Anilla en D; Anilla de llavero; Cierre de mosquetón; Hebilla de liberación rápida; Gancho de resorte; Anilla doble; Gancho giratorio; Otro
fr: Éléments d’attache du cordon: Pince pour badge; Enrouleur de badge; Mousqueton; Anneau en D; Porte-clés; Fermoir mousqueton; Boucle à dégagement rapide; Mousqueton; Anneau brisé; Mousqueton pivotant; Autre
hu: Nyakpánt rögzítőeleme: Jelvénycsipesz; Jelvényroló; Karabiner; D-gyűrű; Kulcskarika; Delfinkapocs; Gyorskioldó csat; Karabinerhorog; Hasított gyűrű; Forgókarabiner; Egyéb
zh-CN: 挂绳连接硬件: 徽章夹; 徽章卷轴; 登山扣; D 型环; 钥匙圈; 龙虾扣; 快拆扣; 弹簧扣; 开口环; 旋转扣; 其他
sv: Fästhårdvara för snodd: Namnskyltsklämma; Jojo för passerkort; Karbinhake; D-ring; Nyckelring; Karbinlås; Snabbspänne; Snäppkrok; Delad ring; Svivelkrok; Övrigt
ko: 끈 부착 하드웨어: 배지 클립; 배지 릴; 카라비너; D링; 키링; 랍스터 클래스프; 퀵릴리스 버클; 스냅 훅; 스플릿 링; 스위블 훅; 기타
it: Aggancio del laccetto: Clip per badge; Portabadge estensibile; Moschettone; Anello a D; Anello portachiavi; Chiusura a moschettone; Fibbia a sgancio rapido; Moschettone a scatto; Anello brisé; Moschettone girevole; Altro
ru: Фурнитура крепления шнурка: Зажим для значка; Ретрактор для значка; Карабин; D-образное кольцо; Кольцо для ключей; Замок-карабин; Быстроразъемная пряжка; Карабин-защелка; Заводное кольцо; Карабин с вертлюгом; Другое
en: Lanyard attachment hardware: Badge clip; Badge reel; Carabiner; D-ring; Keyring; Lobster clasp; Quick-release buckle; Snap hook; Split ring; Swivel hook; Other
bg-BG: Окачващ елемент за връзка за носене: Клипс за значка; Макара за значка; Карабинер; D-образен пръстен; Халка за ключодържател; Закопчалка тип омар; Катарама за бързо освобождаване; Кука с пружина; Разделен пръстен; Въртяща се кука; Друго
de: Befestigungsvorrichtung des Lanyards: Badge-Clip; Badge-Jojo; Karabiner; D-Ring; Schlüsselring; Karabinerverschluss; Schnellverschluss-Schnalle; Schnapphaken; Spaltring; Drehhaken; Sonstige
nl: Lanyard bevestigingshardware: Badgeclip; Badgerol; Karabijnhaak; D-ring; Sleutelring; Karabijnsluiting; Snelsluiting; Musketonhaak; Splitring; Draaibare haak; Overig
th: อุปกรณ์ยึดเชือกคล้อง ฮาร์ดแวร์: คลิปหนีบบัตร; สายคล้องบัตรแบบม้วนเก็บได้; คาราไบเนอร์; ดีริง; พวงกุญแจ; ตะขอก้ามปู; หัวเข็มขัดปลดเร็ว; ตะขอสแน็ป; ห่วงแยกร้อยกุญแจ; ตะขอแบบหมุน; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Strojna oprema za pritrditev traku za ključe: Sponka za značko; Potezanka za značko; Vponka; D-obroček; Obroček za ključe; Karabinska zaponka; Zaponka za hitro odpenjanje; Kavelj z zaponko; Razcepni obroček; Vrtljivi kavelj; Drugo
ro-RO: Element de fixare al șnurului de prindere: Clemă pentru ecuson; Rolă pentru ecuson; Carabinieră; Inel în formă de D; Inel pentru chei; Închizătoare tip lobster; Cataramă cu eliberare rapidă; Cârlig cu carabină; Inel despicat; Cârlig rotativ; Altele
tr: Boyun ipi takma donanımı: Rozet klipsi; Rozet makarası; Karabina; D halka; Anahtarlık halkası; Istakoz klips; Hızlı açılan toka; Yaylı kanca; Ayrık halka; Döner kanca; Diğer
nb: Maskinvare for festing av nøkkelsnor: Badge-klemme; Badge-snelle; Karabinkrok; D-ring; Nøkkelring; Hummerlås; Hurtigspenne; Fjærkrok; Splittring; Svivelkrok; Annet
pl: Osprzęt mocujący smycz: Klips do identyfikatora; Rolka do identyfikatora; Karabińczyk; Półkółko (D-ring); Kółko na klucze; Zapięcie na karabińczyk; Klamra szybkiego rozpinania; Karabińczyk zatrzaskowy; Kółko dzielone; Karabińczyk obrotowy; Inne
da: Fastgørelse til nøglesnor: Klemme til badge; Badge-yoyo; Karabinhage; D-ring; Nøglering; Karabinlås; Quick release-spænde; Karabinhage; Splitring; Svirvelhage; Andet
pt-PT: Equipamento de fixação para cordões: Clipe de crachá; Porta-crachá retrátil; Mosquetão; Argola em D; Porta-chaves; Fecho mosquetão; Fivela de libertação rápida; Mosquetão com mola; Argola de porta-chaves; Mosquetão giratório; Outro
sk-SK: Upevňovacie prvky na šnúrke: Spona na odznak; Navijak na odznak; Karabína; D-krúžok; Krúžok na kľúče; Karabínka (lobster); Rýchloupínacia pracka; Zaklapávacia karabínka; Otvárací krúžok; Otočná karabínka; Iné
zh-TW: 掛繩連接五金: 識別證夾; 識別證拉環; 登山扣; D 型環; 鑰匙圈; 龍蝦扣; 快拆扣; 彈簧扣; 雙圈環; 旋轉掛鉤; 其他
el: Εξάρτημα κορδονιού υλικού εξοπλισμού: Κλιπ για σήμα; Μηχανισμός περιτύλιξης για σήμα; Καραμπίνερ; Κρίκος σχήματος D; Μπρελόκ; Κούμπωμα καβουράκι; Πόρπη ταχείας αποδέσμευσης; Γάντζος με ασφάλεια; Κρίκος διαχωρισμού; Περιστρεφόμενος γάντζος; Άλλο
cs: Prvek k upevnění šňůrky na krk: Klip na odznak; Naviják na odznak; Karabina; D-kroužek; Kroužek na klíče; Karabinka; Rychloupínací spona; Zacvakávací karabina; Dělený kroužek; Otočná karabina; Jiné
vi: Phần cứng gắn dây đeo: Kẹp huy hiệu; Cuộn dây huy hiệu; Móc khóa carabiner; Khoen chữ D; Vòng móc khóa; Móc càng cua; Khóa nhả nhanh; Móc lò xo; Vòng kẽm xoắn; Móc xoay; Khác
pt-BR: Cordão ferragem de fixação: Presilha para crachá; Porta-crachá retrátil; Mosquetão; Argola em D; Chaveiro; Fecho lagosta; Fivela de liberação rápida; Fecho mosquetão; Argola dividida; Fecho giratório; Outro